Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1935.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706(b) and (e) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2706. Terroristic threats.* * *(b) Restitution.--A person convicted of violating this section shall, in addition to any other sentence imposed or restitution ordered under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9721(c) (relating to sentencing generally), be sentenced to pay restitution in an amount equal to the cost of the evacuation, including, but not limited to, fire and police response; emergency medical service or emergency preparedness response; and transportation of an individual from the building, place of assembly or facility. The 123456789101112131415161718 court may also order restitution in an amount equal to the cost of supplies, equipment and materials, including the salary, overtime pay or other wages of affected employees and first responders.* * *(d.1) Sentencing enhancement.--In addition to any minimum term of imprisonment authorized or established by State law for an offense under subsection (a), the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for courts to consider in cases involving a terroristic threat against a school entity or an institution of higher education.(e) [Definition] Definitions.--[As used in this section, the term "communicates" means conveys in person or by written or electronic means, including telephone, electronic mail, Internet, facsimile, telex and similar transmissions.] As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Communicates." Conveys in person or by written or electronic means, including telephone, email, Internet, facsimile, telex and similar transmissions."Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(3) The Pennsylvania State University.20250HB1935PN2434 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The University of Pittsburgh.(5) Temple University.(6) Lincoln University.(7) Another institution designated by the Commonwealth as State-related.(8) An accredited private or independent college or university.(9) A private licensed school as defined in section 2 of the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act."School entity." A public school, including a charter school or a cyber charter school, a private school, a nonpublic school, an intermediate unit or an area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1935PN2434 - 3 - 123456789101112131415